Utah statutes.
10-18-202.   Required steps before a municipality may provide cable television or public telecommunications services.

Before a municipality may engage or offer to engage in an activity described in Subsection 10-18-201(1), the legislative body of the municipality shall:

(1)  hold a preliminary public hearing;

(2)  if the legislative body elects to proceed after holding the preliminary public hearing required by Subsection (1), approve the hiring of a feasibility consultant to conduct a feasibility study in accordance with Section 10-18-203;

(3)  determine whether under the feasibility study conducted under Section 10-18-203, the average annual revenues under Subsection 10-18-203(2)(f) exceed the average annual costs under Subsection 10-18-203(2)(e) by at least the amount necessary to meet the bond obligations of any bonds issued to fund the proposed cable television services or public telecommunications services:

(a)  based on the feasibility study's analysis:

(i)  for the first year of the study; and

(ii)  the five-year projection; and

(b)  separately stated with respect to:

(i)  the proposed cable television services; or

(ii)  the proposed public telecommunications services;

(4)  if the conditions of Subsection (3) are met, hold the public hearings required by Section 10-18-203; and

(5)  after holding the public hearings required by Section 10-18-203, if the legislative body of the municipality elects to proceed, adopt by resolution the feasibility study.

